src/ParadigmFeatures/NonStPreposForms/GetNonStPreposForms.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +True

LEXICON Root
он		True;
она́		True;
оно́		True;
oни		True;
никто́		True;
ничто́		True;
некого		True;
нечего		True;
никако́й		True;
никото́рый		True;
ниче́й		True;

LEXICON True
+True	#;
